Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-113
Departments; business hours.

Each department shall be open for the transaction of business at least from 8 a.m. until 5 p.m., of each day except Saturdays, Sundays, and days declared by statutory enactment or proclamation of the President or Governor to be holidays.

Laws 1919, c. 190, § 13, p. 439;

C.S.1922, § 7254;

C.S.1929, § 81-115;

R.S.1943, § 81-113.